Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 136A.101, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Assigned family responsibility. "Assigned family responsibility" means the amount of a family's contribution to a student's cost of attendance, as determined by a federal need analysis. For dependent students, the assigned family responsibility is 95 percent of the parental contribution. deleted text begin If the parental contribution is between $0 and negative $1,500, the assigned family responsibility is 50 percent of the parental contribution. If the parental contribution is less than negative $1,500, the recognized parental contribution is negative $1,500.deleted text end For independent students with dependents other than a spouse, the assigned family responsibility is 71 percent of the student contribution. For independent students without dependents other than a spouse, the assigned family responsibility is 35 percent of the student contribution. deleted text begin If the student contribution is between $0 and negative $1,500, the assigned family responsibility is 50 percent of the student contribution. If the student contribution is less than negative $1,500, the recognized student contribution is negative $1,500.deleted text end new text begin If the student contribution or parental contribution is less than $0, the assigned family responsibility is $0.new text end For a student registering for less than full time, the office shall prorate the assigned family responsibility using the ratio of the number of credits the student is enrolled in to the number of credits for full-time enrollment. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 136A.121, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Surplus appropriation. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end If the amount appropriated is determined by the office to be more than sufficient to fund projected grant demand in the second year of the biennium, the office maydeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end increase the living and miscellaneous expense allowance new text begin for students attending public postsecondary educational institutions new text end in the second year of the biennium by up to an amount that retains sufficient appropriations to fund the projected grant demanddeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) when calculating assigned family responsibility, recognize a negative parental contribution or student contribution that is less than negative $1,500 to a value that is equal to the lowest student contribution provided under the federal needs analysis. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end The deleted text begin adjustments in paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin adjustmentnew text end may be made one or more times. In making the determination that there are more than sufficient funds, the office shall balance the need for sufficient resources to meet the projected demand for grants with the goal of fully allocating the appropriation for state grants. An increase in the living and miscellaneous expense allowance deleted text begin or a modified assigned family responsibilitydeleted text end under this subdivision does not carry forward into a subsequent biennium. Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment and applies to state grant awards beginning in the summer 2026 academic term. new text end